District of Columbia statutes.
4-1301.51

Mandatory investigation of child abuse and neglect cases by multidisciplinary team.

(a)

Every instance of sexual abuse of a child shall be reviewed and investigated by a multidisciplinary investigation team (“MDT”), which shall focus, first, on the needs of the child, and, second, on the law enforcement, prosecution, and related civil proceedings. The MDT may handle other instances of child abuse and neglect as identified in the protocol provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(1)

A MDT shall consist of one or more representatives of the:

(A)

Metropolitan Police Department;

(B)

Child and Family Services Agency; and

(C)

Office of the Corporation Counsel.

(2)

The Office of the United States Attorney and the Children’s Advocacy Center shall be requested to designate one or more representatives to serve on a MDT, and those designated representatives shall be included on the MDT.

(3)

A MDT may also include:

(A)

A representative of the District of Columbia Public Schools;

(B)

Licensed mental health practitioners;

(C)

Medical personnel;

(D)

Child development specialists;

(E)

Victim counselors; and

(F)

Experts in the assessment and treatment of substance abuse.

(b)

The MDT shall adopt a written child abuse protocol to ensure coordination and cooperation among all agencies investigating and prosecuting cases arising from alleged child abuse or neglect to increase the efficiency and effectiveness of the agencies handling the cases and to facilitate the provision of services to children and families. The protocol shall:

(1)

Define additional categories of abuse and neglect cases, in addition to sexual abuse, which will be handled by the MDT;

(2)

Outline in detail the procedures to be used in investigating and prosecuting cases arising from alleged child abuse or neglect; and

(3)

Outline in detail the methods to be used in coordinating treatment programs and other services to the child, the family, and the perpetrator.

(c)

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I-A, § 151
as added Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-206, § 2(f), 49 DCR 7815
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 6, 50 DCR 1092
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 34(b), 51 DCR 881
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-603, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 687).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 4-1301.51, see § 2 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-494, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9781).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-240, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2753).
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 14-310, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction; and repealed subsec. (c) which had read as follows: “(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall apply as of October 1, 2003.”
This section is referenced in § 4-1301.52.